Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.007

"Veteran" defined for certain purposes—Service in certain capacities.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1371-S.SL) ***

"Veteran" includes every person who, at the time he or she seeks the benefits of RCW 46.18.212, 46.18.235, 72.36.030, 41.04.010, 73.04.090, or 43.180.250, has received a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005, and who has served in at least one of the following capacities:

(1) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;

(2) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;

(3) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;

(4) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946;

(5) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15, 1945; or

(6) A United States documented merchant mariner with service aboard an oceangoing vessel operated by the department of defense, or its agents, from both June 25, 1950, through July 27, 1953, in Korean territorial waters and from August 5, 1964, through May 7, 1975, in Vietnam territorial waters, and who received a military commendation.

[ 2024 c 146 s 3; 2017 c 97 s 1; 2013 c 42 s 1; 2010 c 161 s 1105; 2007 c 448 s 1; 2006 c 252 s 2. Prior: 2005 c 251 s 1; 2005 c 216 s 7; 2002 c 292 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.